Kentucky, session 2025RS, HB581.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
SECTION 1. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 237 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) As used in this section, "safe storage depository" means a safe or other secure
container which, when locked, is incapable of being opened without the key,
combination, or other unlocking mechanism and is capable of preventing an
unauthorized person from obtaining access to and possession of its contents.
(2) A person who owns or is a custodian of a firearm shall not store or otherwise
leave the firearm out of his or her immediate possession or control without
having first securely locked the firearm in an appropriate safe storage depository
or rendered it incapable of being fired by use of a gun-locking device appropriate
to that weapon.
SECTION 2. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 237 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) (a) Any owner or other person lawfully in possession of a firearm who suffers
the loss or theft of the firearm or any person who sells ammunition who
suffers a loss or theft of ammunition shall report the facts and
circumstances of the loss or theft to an appropriate law enforcement agency
within twenty-four (24) hours of the discovery of the loss or theft.
(b) The report required by paragraph (a) of this subsection shall contain, if
known, the caliber, make, model, manufacturer’s name, and serial number,
if any, and any other distinguishing number or identification mark on the
firearm, or the make, type, and caliber of the ammunition.
(2) A law enforcement agency that receives a report pursuant to subsection (1) of this
section shall enter the reported information into the National Crime Information
Center database.
Page 1 of 2
XXXX 2/14/2025 8:41 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1821
Section 3. KRS 237.990 is amended to read as follows:
(1) Any person who violates any of the provisions of KRS 237.030 to 237.050 shall be
guilty of a Class D felony.
(2) Any person who violates any of the provisions of KRS 237.030 to 237.050, and in
so doing uses any destructive device or booby trap device to avoid detection by law
enforcement or other government personnel or to avoid theft or detection by any
other person, of any controlled substance as set forth in KRS Chapter 218A and
held in violation of KRS 218A.140, shall be guilty of a Class C felony.
(3) Any person who violates Section 1 of this Act shall be guilty of a Class A
misdemeanor.
(4) Any person who fails to report a loss or theft as required by Section 2 of this Act
shall be guilty of a Class A misdemeanor.
Page 2 of 2
XXXX 2/14/2025 8:41 AM Jacketed